csv2yaml/yaml_output/VII_CNJ_ii.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx: gonzaabiig
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv: gonzaabiinig
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx: gonzaabiisinog
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv: gonzaabiisininig
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx: gonzaabiigiban
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv: gonzaabiinigiban
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx: gonzaabiisinoogiban
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv: gonzaabiisininigiban
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx: gonzaabiigwen
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv: gonzaabiinigwen
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx: gonzaabiisinoogwen
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv: gonzaabiisininiigwen
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx: gonzaabiigobanen
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv: gonzaabiinigobanen
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx: gonzaabiisinoogobanen
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv: gonzaabiisininigobanen
